src/fst/morphology/stems/adverbs.lexc
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software;  you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@uit.no or feedback@divvun.no

!! # Inari Saami adverbs

!! ## The morphology
LEXICON ADV !!≈ * **@CODE@** adds the +Adv tag
+Adv: K ; 

LEXICON PxADV  !!≈ * **@CODE@** the Adv tag and Ill Px
 ADV ;
 ADV_Px_only ;

LEXICON ADV_Px_only
+Adv+PxSg1:^RVSH%>ân K ;
+Adv+PxSg2:^RVSH%>âd K ;
+Adv+PxSg3:^RVSH%>is K ;
+Adv+PxDu1:^RVSH%>ân K ;
+Adv+PxDu2:^RVSH%>âd K ;
+Adv+PxDu3:^RVSH%>is K ;
+Adv+PxPl1:^RVSH%>ân K ;
+Adv+PxPl2:^RVSH%>âd K ;
+Adv+PxPl3:^RVSH%>is K ;

LEXICON NAAL !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
:náál ADV ; 
+Use/NG:náálá ADV ; 


LEXICON BEL-ADV !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
bel:#bel ADV ; 
bel+Err/Orth:#pel ADV ; 
beln:#beln ADV ; 
beln+Err/Orth:#peln ADV ; 
bele:#bele ADV ; 
bele+Err/Orth:#pele ADV ; 

LEXICON PEL-ADV !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
pel+Err/Orth:#bel ADV ; 
pel:#pel ADV ; 
peln+Err/Orth:#beln ADV ; 
peln:#peln ADV ; 
pele+Err/Orth:#bele ADV ; 
pele:#pele ADV ; 


!! ## The stems

LEXICON Adverb !!≈ * **@CODE@**
Ruotâ% pele+Err/Orth:Ruotâ#bele ADV ;
Ruotâ% peln+Err/Orth:Ruotâ#beln ADV ;
Ruošâ% pel+Err/Orth:Ruošâ#bel ADV ;
Ruošâ% pele+Err/Orth:Ruošâ#bele ADV ;
Ruošâ% peln+Err/Orth:Ruošâ#beln ADV ;
Suomâ% pel+Err/Orth:Suomâ#bel ADV ;
Suomâ% pele+Err/Orth:Suomâ#bele ADV ;
Suomâ% peln+Err/Orth:Suomâ#beln ADV ;
Taažâ% pel+Err/Orth:Taažâ#bel ADV ;
Taažâ% pele+Err/Orth:Taažâ#bele ADV ;
Taažâ% peln+Err/Orth:Taažâ#beln ADV ;
aaibâs+Err/Orth:aaibas ADV "aivan" ;
aalgâkeččin:aalgâ#keččin ADV ;
addâgâs:addâgâs ADV ; 
ain-uv:ain-uv ADV ; 
aldaluvâi:aldaluvâi ADV "lähekkäin" ; 
aldeláá:aldeláá ADV "lähemmäs" ;  
aleláá:aleláá ADV "ylemmäs" ;  
asun ADV ;
avepeeivi ADV "ikänään" ; 
aštus:aštus ADV "todella" ;
ciäggust ADV ;
dynaamisávt ADV ;
eeppidhánnáá ADV ;
eiduttâlde:eiduttâlde ADV ; 
endurist ADV ;
ennâg ADV ;
ereb:ereb ADV "paitsi" ;
eresnáál:eres# NAAL "toisin" ; 
eromâš:eromâš ADV "erittäin" ; 
eskenpalij ADV ;
ijâi% peeivij+MWE:ijâi% peeivij ADV ;
ooláádmuddoost:ooláád#muddoost ADV ;
eštus:eštus ADV "todella" ; 
fakkâ:fakkâ ADV "yhtäkkiä" ; 
fijnásávt:fijnásávt ADV ;
funktionaallávt ADV ;
fárus:fárus PxADV ; ! PM: What is this? Delete?
fáálun ADV ;
fáárust:fáárust PxADV ;
haaldust:haaldust PxADV "hallussa" ; 
heeviimist ADV ;
hirmâd:hirmâd ADV "hirveä" ; ! mainly in front of adjectives
hitruu+Err/Orth:hittruu ADV ;
humij% hamijttáá:humij% hamijttáá ADV "muitta mutkitta" ;
hyeneeht:hyeneeht ADV "huonosti" ; 
háská ADV ;
iho ADV ;
ihánâs:ihánâs ADV "hyvänsä" ; 
iiŋŋân ADV ;
illávaje:illávaje ADV "pahoinvoivana" ;
intensiivlávt ADV ;
iptop PEL-ADV ;
ittinâs ADV ;
ivijmield:ivijmield ADV ;
iäskân:iäskân ADV ; 
iđedist ADV ;
jessivnáá ADV ;
jieht:jieht ADV ; 
jiermittemeht:jiermittemeht ADV "järjettömästi" ; 
jiešalnees:jieš#alnees ADV ;
jiänusân:jiänusân ADV ; 
jolgâ ADV ;
jormeeld:jormeeld ADV "rypyssä" ;
jođettâsâst ADV ;
jyehikuávlun:jyehikuávlun ADV "" ;
jyehimnáál:jyehim# NAAL "jaossa" ;
jyehináál:jyehi# NAAL ;
jävriláá ADV ;
kalas:kalas ADV "kylliksi" ; 
kannjeed ADV ;
keessiv:keessiv ADV ; 
keppisávt:keppisávt ADV ;
kesipieggâláá ADV ;
kidâ ADV ;
kieŋâlâsâst ADV ;
kirjálávt:kirjálávt ADV "kirjallisesti" ; 
kiäigud:kiäigud ADV "sojollaan" ; 
kiävláá:kiävláá ADV "taivutettu (liian voimakkaasti)" ;
kogobeht ADV ;
kommunikatiivlávt ADV ;
kooskâl:kooskâl ADV ;
koskiijâ ADV ;
koskân:koskân ADV ; 
koskâstuvâi:koskâstuvâi ADV "ajoittain" ;
kost:kost ADV "missä" ; 
kriittisávt ADV ;
kuhheeb:kuhheeb ADV "" ;
kuhás:kuhás ADV "etäälle" ; 
kukken:kukken ADV "etäällä" ; 
kullood ADV "kuullen" ;
kuohtii:kuohtii ADV ; 
kuttii:kuttii ADV ; 
kuullâmnáál:kuullâm# NAAL "kuultavana" ; 
kuusnii:kuusnii ADV "jonnekin" ; 
kuáhtulávt:kuáhtulávt ADV ;
kuásij:kuásij ADV "miltei" ; 
kuávdoo ADV "keskellä, keskeltä" ;
kuávsuikeejist ADV ;
kyessist ADV ;
kyevtináál:kyevti# NAAL ;
kyevtpelij:kyevtpelij ADV ;
vuáluskárŋá:vuálus#kárŋá ADV ;
káávvud:káávvud ADV "ylössuin" ; 
lappâd:lappâd ADV "ohi" ; 
lavvâ:lavvâ ADV "tiiviisti" ; 
lihâttimnáál:lihâttim# NAAL"liikutettavana" ;
liijgás ADV ;
liäddud:liäddud ADV "levällään" ; 
liävvud:liävvud ADV "kuivumaan levitettynä" ;
loopâst ADV "lopuksi" ;
ložžâ ADV ;
lunnáán ADV ;
luussân ADV ;
luámádâs:luámádâs ADV "limittäin" ; 
maacij ADV "mutkin" ;
maajaa BEL-ADV "takanapäin" ; 
maaŋaa BEL-ADV "takanapäin" ; 
maajeeldkietân:maajeeld#kietân ADV ;
maaŋeest ADV ; 
maaŋgânáál:maaŋgâ# NAAL "monella tavoin" ; 
mahten ADV ;
mahtniináál:mahtnii# NAAL "jotenkin" ;
majas ADV ;
majeláá ADV ;
makaš ADV ;
masa:masa ADV ; 
maŋa BEL-ADV "perässäpäin" ; 
maŋaluvâi:maŋaluvâi ADV "peräkkäin" ; 
maŋeláhháá:maŋeláhháá ADV "vähän myöhemmin" ; 
maŋŋaalsis ADV ;
meddâlkulij:meddâl#kulij ADV "poispäin" ; ! from Petter
meiddei:meiddei ADV ; 
merhâšitteht:merhâšitteht ADV ; 
meččiláá ADV ;
mieldi:mieldás ADV_Px_only ;
mielâmield:mielâmield ADV ;
mietimái:mietimái ADV "peruuttamattomasti" ; 
mii BEL-ADV ;
minttâ ADV ;
miäldán ADV ;
miäđáábel ADV ;
mojonjalmij:mojo#njalmij ADV "hymysuin" ; 
moojii BEL-ADV ;
moojiikeččin:moojii#keččin ADV ;
moskočolmij ADV ;
mottoomnáál:mottoom# NAAL "jotenkuten" ; 
moovtâ ADV ;
muuneeld:muuneeld ADV "etukäteen" ;
muáđui:muáđui ADV "kasvokkain" ; 
máddáápele ADV ;
mádáskulij ADV ;
máádás+Err/Orth:máádâs ADV ;
mäddin ADV ;
mäksimnáál:mäksim# NAAL "maksettavissa" ;
na:na ADV ; 
naba ADV ;
nahande ADV ;
netto ADV ;
njeigâ:njeigâ ADV "kohti" ; 
njunolâsân ADV ;
njuolgisteeđân ADV ;
njuálgu ADV ;
njálgásávt:njálgásávt ADV "makeasti" ; 
nube BEL-ADV ;
nubekerd ADV ;
nubenáál:nube# NAAL "toisin" ;
nuhtán:nuhtán ADV ;
nuorttii BEL-ADV "itäpuolella" ; 
nuortâs ADV ;
návt:návt ADV ; 
ohtii:ohtii ADV ; 
ohtuu:ohtuun ADV_Px_only ;
ohtâsâš ADV ; 
olgoskulij ADV ;
olmânáál:olmâ#  NAAL "kunnolla" ;
onne:onne ADV "tänään" ; 
oovdeld:oovdeld ADV "edeltäkäsin" ; 
oovtnáál:oovt# NAAL ;
oovtâjienâlávt ADV ;
orjâlâšpiegâpeln:orjâlâš#piegâ BEL-ADV ; 
ovdebist:ovdebist ADV ; !Coming from missinglist
ovdii BEL-ADV "etupuolella" ; 
ovddii BEL-ADV "etupuolella" ; 
ovdil ADV ;
ovdâs-maŋas ADV ;
paajaa BEL-ADV "yläpuolelle" ; 
paajaakeččin:paajaa#keččin ADV ;
pajal:pajal PxADV ; ! PM: What is this? Delete?
pajalan:paijaals ADV_Px_only ;
pajalist:paijaalst ADV_Px_only ;
paijeen:paijeen ADV "ylhäällä" ; 
pajeláhháá:pajeláhháá ADV "ylemmäs (vähäsen)" ;
paldpaldluvâi:pald#paldluvâi ADV "vieri vieressä" ;
peht:peht ADV ; 
peeleest:peeleest ADV_Px_only ;
pelijieggâst ADV ;
peri:peri ADV ; 
pirrâ+Use/NG:pirrâs PxADV ; ! N+Px? No, back to Adv+Px due to MT 
pirrâluvâi:pirrâluvâi ADV "toistensa ympärillä" ;
piäđgui:piäđgui ADV "hajallaan" ; 
ponjen ADV ;
pođos ADV ;
puttáht:puttáht ADV "puhtaasti" ; 
pyereeb ADV ;
päljispoođâi:päljis#poođâi ADV ;
rekkâ:rekkâ ADV "räikeästi" ; 
rijjâtátulávt:rijjâtátulávt ADV ;
ruossâlâsân ADV ;
ráájust:ráájust ADV "tallessa" ; 
seevvist ADV ;
setináálá:seti# NAAL ;
sijvuht:sijvuht ADV "" ;
siskii BEL-ADV ;
siste:sistest PxADV ; 
siämmáá% mielâst ADV ;
siämmáánáál:siämmáá# NAAL "samoin" ;
snuortij ADV ;
suomâs ADV "suomeksi" ; 
syele:syele ADV ; 
sätináálá:säti# NAAL ;
taan% tove ADV ;
taavaa BEL-ADV ;
tallân ADV "heti" ;
tastmaŋa+Err/Orth:tasmaŋa ADV "sen jälkeen" ;
tavepiegâ:tave#piegâ BEL-ADV ; 
tađe ADV ;
tiervi:tiervi ADV "jonkin verran" ;
tieid:tieid ADV ; 
tievâ ADV ; 
tijmá ADV ;
tivvoomnáál:tivvoom# NAAL "" ;
tiäđulávt:tiäđulávt ADV "tietoisesti" ; 
tohe:tohe ADV "" ;
tolemustáá ADV ;
toohâmnáál:toohâm# NAAL "tehtävänä" ; 
toos:toos ADV "siihen" ; 
tovhon:tovhon ADV "tuonne" ; 
tovn BEL-ADV ;
tuohu ADV ;
tuáhunteehin:tuáhunteehin ADV "sinne" ; 
tuáris PEL-ADV ;
tuárrást:tuárrást ADV ; 
tušij% tiet ADV ;
tyehimustáá:tyehimustáá ADV "taaimpana" ; ! from Petter
tánávt:tánávt ADV "tällä tavoin" ; 
táválávt:táválávt ADV "tavallisesti" ;
táárus ADV ;
tärhibeht ADV ;
tääbbin+Err/Orth:tääbin ADV "here" ; 
ubânâsân ADV ;
ucánjáhháá ADV ;
ulguu BEL-ADV "ulkopuolella" ; 
uuccâmnáál:uuccâm# NAAL ;
uáinimnáál:uáinim# NAAL "esille" ; !Coming from missinglist
uáinud ADV "nähden" ;
uálgis PEL-ADV ;
uálináál:uáli# NAAL "suunnilleen" ; !Coming from missinglist
uárji BEL-ADV ;
uásild ADV ;
uástimnáál:uástim# NAAL ;
vaarâ:vaarâ ADV "ilmeisesti" ; 
valjeest:valjeest ADV ; !Coming from missinglist
veltihánnáá+Err/Orth:velttidhánnáá ADV ; 
viehânáál:viehâ# NAAL "melko lailla" ;
viestâr BEL-ADV ;
viestârân ADV ;
vinnood:vinnood ADV "vinossa" ;
vistig+Err/Orth:vistâg ADV "aluksi" ; 
vuohâsávt:vuohâsávt ADV "mukavasti" ; 
vuoluu BEL-ADV ;
vuossâmuštáá ADV ;
vuálos ADV ;
vuálá ADV ;
vuástáluvâi ADV ;
vyeliláhháá ADV ;
vyestiviirdán ADV ;
vááijuv:vááijuv ADV "vailla" ; 
áigá ADV "toimeen" ;
áálgukeččin ADV ;
äŋgirávt:äŋgirávt ADV ;
čiäppáht:čiäppáht ADV "" ;
čižet PEL-ADV ;
čoođâ-čoođâ:čoođâ-čoođâ ADV ;
čurgâ:čurgâ ADV "huolellisesti" ; 
čuákkist ADV ;
čäciláhháá:čäciláhháá ADV "hieman lähemmäs vettä" ;
šierânáál:šierâ# NAAL ; 
šievnáál:šiev# NAAL "hyvin" ; 
rievtisnáál:rievtis# NAAL "oikein" ; 
šleđgâlávt:šleđgâlávt ADV "sähköisesti" ; 
taammittáá ADV ;
haaldun:haldus ADV_Px_only "haltuun" ;
haaldust:haaldust PxADV "hallussa" ;
čižeppeln ADV ;
liijkás% tooláás ADV ;
